Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 3. Procedure for Arrest and Imprisonment

§ 3571.
Place of commitment.

When a person authorized to serve process is required by law to commit a person to jail, such commitment shall be in the county where the arrest is made, unless otherwise required by law.
If there is not a legal jail in the county, the commitment shall be made in an adjoining county in which there is a legal jail.

Form of execution.

Execution commanding officer, for want of sufficient goods and chattels of the debtor, to take his body and commit him to the keeper of the jail in the county, “or such other jail as the law directs,” sufficiently complied with the statutory form of § 5908 of this title and justified commitment of debtor to jail in an adjoining county, when jail in county where the arrest was made had been destroyed by fire. In re Hunt, 85 Vt. 345, 82 A. 178, 1912 Vt. LEXIS 196 (1912).

When there was no legal jail in county, there was no error in mittimus directing commitment to jail in adjoining county. State v. Malloy, 54 Vt. 96, 1881 Vt. LEXIS 77 (1881).

In action of trespass for false imprisonment, officer cannot justify under execution regular upon its face, where he commits debtor in different county from the one in which arrest is made, when there is a legal jail in the latter county, although commitment is made in county commanded in execution. Clayton v. Scott, 45 Vt. 386, 1872 Vt. LEXIS 119 (1872).

§ 3572.
Manner of commitment.

The officer committing a prisoner shall deliver him or her to the keeper of the jail, within the same, and give the keeper an attested copy of the process on which the commitment is made, with his or her return thereon.

§ 3573.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 3574.
Penalty for not delivering copy.

An officer who does not within six hours deliver a true copy of the warrant or process by which he or she detains a prisoner, to a person who demands such copy and tenders the fees therefor, shall forfeit to such prisoner $200.00, to be recovered in an action of tort on this statute.

§§ 3575,
3576.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 3577.
Privilege from arrest.

The Governor, Lieutenant Governor, State Treasurer, Secretary of State, Auditor of Accounts, Attorney General, and members of the General Assembly and officers and witnesses whose duty it is to attend thereon, in all cases except treason, felony, and breach of the peace, shall be privileged from arrest and imprisonment during their necessary attendance on and in going to and returning from the General Assembly.

A party or witness in a cause pending in any court in the State or before special masters, auditors, referees, or commissioners, and a witness in a criminal cause pending in any such court, shall not be arrested, imprisoned or detained by virtue of civil process. Any witness summoned from outside the State in a criminal cause, pending in any court within the State, shall be privileged from the service of papers of any kind whatsoever, and from arrest for any cause while going to, attending at, or returning from such court or trial of such cause.

§ 3578.
Pleading privilege from arrest.

When a person is privileged from arrest on execution so informs the officer at the time the arrest is made and claims his or her privilege, the giving of a jail bond shall not be deemed a waiver thereof but the facts shall be sufficient defense to an action for breach of condition of the bond.

The person making the arrest shall state in his or her return of service of the execution that the person arrested made known to him or her and claimed his or her privilege from arrest.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 106, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 3579.
Detaining public carrier to make arrest; penalties.

An officer who has a writ of execution or criminal process for the arrest of a person whom he or she has reason to believe is on a public carrier may notify the operator of the carrier thereof. The operator shall thereupon detain the carrier a reasonable length of time at any place where it is scheduled to stop, and before it leaves the State, to enable the officer to examine the carrier and, if found, to arrest and remove the person against whom he or she has the writ of execution or criminal process.

An operator who, after due notice from an officer holding a writ of execution or criminal process as specified in subsection (a) of this section, refuses or neglects to detain the carrier, and in consequence thereof the person sought to be arrested escapes from the borders of this State, if for a civil action, shall be liable to the plaintiff in an action of tort on this statute, for all damages arising therefrom. If for a criminal action, he or she shall be fined not more than $100.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 107, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 3580.
Escapes—Jailer to keep prisoner.

The keeper of a jail shall safely keep a prisoner committed to his or her custody until discharged from imprisonment.

§ 3581.
Liability for escapes.

Such keeper shall be liable for escapes made from such jail.

§ 3582.
County answerable if jail insufficient.

When an escape is made in consequence of the insufficiency of the jail, without negligence of the keeper, either in keeping the prisoner or repairing the jail, the county shall be answerable to such keeper for the costs and damages he or she sustains in consequence.

§§ 3583,
3584.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 3585.
Defense and recovery in action on escape.

In an action for an escape, such keeper may prove the circumstances attending the same and the circumstances and property of the prisoner when he or she escapes.
The creditor shall recover only the reasonable damages which he or she sustains in consequence of the escape, and his or her costs.